Utah statutes.
70A-7a-102.   Definitions and index of definitions.
(1)  In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a)  "Bailee" means a person that by a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or
other document of title acknowledges possession of goods and contracts to
deliver them.
(b)  "Carrier" means a person that issues a bill of lading.
(c)  "Consignee" means a person named in a bill of lading to which or to whose
order the bill promises delivery.
(d)  "Consignor" means a person named in a bill of lading as the person from
which the goods have been received for shipment.
(e)  "Delivery order" means a record that contains an order to deliver goods
directed to a warehouse, carrier, or other person that in the ordinary course
of business issues warehouse receipts or bills of lading.
(f)  "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable
commercial standards of fair dealing.
(g)  "Goods" means all things that are treated as movable for the purposes of
a contract for storage or transportation.
(h)  "Issuer" means a bailee that issues a document of title or, in the case
of an unaccepted delivery order, the person that orders the possessor of goods
to deliver.  The term includes a person for which an agent or employee
purports to act in issuing a document if the agent or employee has real or
apparent authority to issue documents, even if the issuer did not receive any
goods, the goods were misdescribed, or in any other respect the agent or
employee violated the issuer's instructions.
(i)  "Person entitled under the document" means the holder, in the case of a
negotiable document of title, or the person to which delivery of the goods is
to be made by the terms of, or pursuant to instructions in a record under, a
nonnegotiable document of title.
(j)  "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that
is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable
form.
(k)  "Shipper" means a person that enters into a contract of transportation
with a carrier.
(l)  "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:
(i)  to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(ii)  to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound,
symbol, or process.
(m)  "Warehouse" means a person engaged in the business of storing goods for
hire.
(2)  Definitions in other chapters applying to this chapter and the sections
in which they appear are:
(a)  "Contract for sale," Section 70A-2-106.
(b)  "Lessee in the ordinary course of business," Section 70A-2a-103.
(c)  "Receipt" of goods, Section 70A-2-103.
(3)  In addition, Chapter 1a, Uniform Commercial Code - General Provisions,
contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation
applicable throughout this chapter.
